Utah statutes.
53A-1a-501.7.   State Charter School Board -- Staff director -- Facilities.

(1) (a)  The State Charter School Board, with the consent of the superintendent of public instruction, shall appoint a staff director for the State Charter School Board.

(b)  The State Charter School Board shall have authority to remove the staff director with the consent of the superintendent of public instruction.

(c)  The position of staff director is exempt from the career service provisions of Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The superintendent of public instruction shall provide space for staff of the State Charter School Board in facilities occupied by the Utah State Office of Education, with costs charged for the facilities equal to those charged other sections and divisions within the Utah State Office of Education and Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.

